foma/docs/examples/finnish-ot-verification.foma
def Elenbaas  EvalAllFeetLeft(Eval(Eval(Eval(Eval(Eval(Eval(Eval(
              Gen .o. MainStress .o. Clash) .o. AlignLeft) .o. FootBin) 
              .o. Lapse) .o. NonFinal) .o. LH) .o. Parse));

def ElenbaasS [Elenbaas .o. Markup -> 0];

def OTnew     EvalAllFeetLeft(Eval(EvalP1(Eval(Eval(Eval(Eval(Eval(
              Gen .o. MainStress .o. Clash) .o. AlignLeft) .o. FootBin)
              .o. Lapse) .o. NonFinal) .o. LH2) .o. Parse));

def OTnewS    [OTnew .o. Markup -> 0];

def KarttunenS [Karttunen .o. Markup -> 0];

######################
# Tests and analysis #
######################

# MH: (I) a simple equivalence test, is Kiparsky or Elenbaas == Karttunen?

regex [KarttunenS.i .o. KiparskyS];
echo *** Is Kiparsky == Karttunen? ***
test identity

regex [KarttunenS.i .o. ElenbaasS];
echo *** Is Elenbaas == Karttunen? ***
test identity

# MH: here is the proof that the new OT grammar with the constraint
#      *(LH)...: no non-final LH-feet captures the generalization expressed
#      in the rule-based grammar perfectly, no matter how long the input word.

regex [KarttunenS.i .o. OTnewS];
echo *** Is OTnew == Karttunen? ***
test identity

# MH: (II) We know Kiparsky & Elenbaas differ from Karttunen and can calculate
#          the set of inputs for which they differ. To make the results clearer
#          we first map all output syllables to the alphabet {H́,Ĺ,H,L}.

def KarttunenC  [Karttunen .o. %(|%) -> 0 .o. Collapse .o. %. -> 0].l;
def KiparskyC   [Kiparsky  .o. %(|%) -> 0 .o. Collapse .o. %. -> 0].l;
def ElenbaasC   [Elenbaas  .o. %(|%) -> 0 .o. Collapse .o. %. -> 0].l;

# MH: the set of words for which Kiparsky differs from Karttunen
def KKdiff  [KarttunenC - KiparskyC] | [KiparskyC - KarttunenC];

# MH: the set of words for which Elenbaas differs from Karttunen
def KEdiff  [KarttunenC - ElenbaasC] | [ElenbaasC - KarttunenC];

# MH: we now have the complete set of patterns where Elenbaas and Kiparsky
#     differ from the traditional analysis and can print out, e.g. the 
#     shortest such pattern:
	  
regex KKdiff;
echo ** Shortest pattern where Kiparsky differs from Karttunen **
print shortest-string

regex KEdiff;
echo ** Shortest pattern where Elenbaas differs from Karttunen **
print shortest-string

# MH: (III) We can do some more collapsing and remove the stress marks from the
#           diffs, allowing us to see just the plain L/H-patterns for whose
#           that are incorrect:
			
def KKdiffC [KKdiff .o. H́ -> H , Ĺ -> L].l;
def KEdiffC [KEdiff .o. H́ -> H , Ĺ -> L].l;

regex KKdiffC & ?^6;
echo *** Patterns of length 6 where Kiparsky differs from Karttunen ***
words
regex KKdiffC & ?^7;
echo *** Patterns of length 7 where Kiparsky differs from Karttunen ***
words
regex KKdiffC & ?^8;
echo *** Patterns of length 8 where Kiparsky differs from Karttunen ***
words
regex KKdiffC & ?^9;
echo *** Patterns of length 9 where Kiparsky differs from Karttunen ***
words

regex KEdiffC & ?^6;
echo *** Patterns of length 6 where Elenbaas differs from Karttunen ***
words
regex KEdiffC & ?^7;
echo *** Patterns of length 7 where Elenbaas differs from Karttunen ***
words
regex KEdiffC & ?^8;
echo *** Patterns of length 8 where Elenbaas differs from Karttunen ***
words
regex KEdiffC & ?^9;
echo *** Patterns of length 9 where Elenbaas differs from Karttunen ***
words
